Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5815.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 61. (1) The filing of a rule under this act raises a rebuttable presumption that the rule was adopted, filed with the secretary of state, and made available for public inspection as required by this act. (2) The publication of a rule in the Michigan register, Register, the Michigan administrative code, Administrative Code, or in an annual supplement to the code Michigan Administrative Code raises a rebuttable presumption that all of the following apply: (a) The rule was adopted, filed with the secretary of state, and made available for public inspection as required by this act. (b) The rule printed in the publication is a true and correct copy of the promulgated rule. (c) All requirements of this act relative to the rule have been were complied with. (3) The courts shall take judicial notice of a rule which that becomes effective under this act. (4) The courts shall exercise independent judgment in deciding whether an agency has acted within its statutory authority for promulgating rules. The courts shall not defer to an agency's interpretation of the law when a statute is ambiguous.